tables/ur-pk-g2.ctb
# Urdu 6 Dot Grade 2 Braille Table
#
#-index-name: Urdu, contracted
#-display-name: Urdu contracted braille
#
#+locale:ur
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
#
# Copyright (C) 2018, 2020 Compass Braille
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
# Prepared by Jake Kyle, Compass Braille in consultation with Buta Masih
# Contact: jake@compassbraille.org
# www.compassbraille.org
# Last updated: 25th February 2020

include ur-pk-g1.utb

# ---------------------------------------
# Contractions of Aspirated Digraphs
# ---------------------------------------

# basic aspirated digraphs
always \x0628\x06BE 23          B8          2
always \x067E\x06BE 235         P8          6
always \x062A\x06BE 1256        T8          [backslash]
always \x0679\x06BE 135         [8          O
always \x062C\x06BE 356         J8          0
# always \x06A9\x06BE 46          K8          .   2020-09-01 old contraction
partword \x0686\x06BE 16        C8          *

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Contractions of aspirated digraphs followed by Fatha (1), Kasra (E) or Damma (U)
# Needed because of the order that the characters appear in text file
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

#                                                        ASCII in full   ASCII contraction
# BU8
always \x0628\x064F\x06BE\x0648 23-136-2456              BU8W            2UW
always \x0628\x064F\x06BE\x0646 23-136-1345              BU8N            2UN
always \x0628\x064F\x06BE\x0644\x0627 23-136-1236        BU8LA           2UV

# BE8
always \x0628\x0650\x06BE\x062C 23-15-245                BE8J            2EJ

# PE8
partword \x067E\x0650\x06BE\x0631 235-15-1235            PE8R            6ER
word \x067E\x0650\x06BE\x0631 235                        PE8R            6

# P18
always \x067E\x064E\x06BE\x0644 235-2-123                P18L            61L
always \x067E\x064E\x06BE\x0644\x0627 235-2-1236         P18LA           61V
always \x067E\x064E\x06BE\x06CC 235-2-24                 P18I            61I

# PU8
always \x067E\x064F\x06BE\x0644 235-136-123              PU8L            6UL
always \x067E\x064F\x06BE\x0648 235-136-2456             PU8W            6UW

# TE8
always \x062A\x0650\x06BE\x06CC 1256-15-24               TE8I            [backslash]EI
always \x0633\x0627\x062A\x0650\x06BE 3456-234-15        SATE8            #S           

# T18
always \x062A\x064E\x06BE\x06CC 1256-2-24                T18I            [backslash]1I

# [E8
always \x0679\x0650\x06BE\x06CC\x0627 135-15-13456       [E8Y            OEY

# CE8
always \x0686\x0650\x06BE\x062F 16-15-145                CE8D            *ED
always \x0686\x0650\x06BE\x06CC 16-15-24                 CE8I            *EI
always \x0686\x0650\x06BE\x0646\x0627 16-15-26           CE8NA           *E5

# CU8
always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x067E 16-136-1234              CU8P            *UP
always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x0631 16-136-1235              CU8P            *UR
always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x0648 16-136-2456              CU8W            *UW
always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x0648\x0626\x06D2 16-136-56-34 CU8W'/          *U;/          
noback always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06D2 16-136-56-34 CU8W'/          *U;/          added 2020-02-25
always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x0679 16-136-246               CU8[            *U[
always \x0686\x064F\x06BE\x0691 16-136-12456             CU8]            *U]

# C18
always \x0686\x064E\x06BE\x0648 16-2-2456                C18W            *1W

# JU8
always \x062C\x064F\x06BE\x06A9 356-136-13               JU8K            0UK

# KE8 - contraction 46 no longer used but letters may need re-ordering
noback always \x06A9\x0650\x06BE\x0691 13-236-15-12456          KE8]            K8E]
noback always \x06A9\x0650\x06BE\x0644\x0627 13-236-15-1236     KE8LA           K8EV

# KU8
always \x06A9\x064F\x06BE\x0648 13-236-136-2456          KU8W            K8UW
always \x06A9\x064F\x06BE\x067E 13-236-136-1234          KU8P            K8UP
always \x06A9\x064F\x06BE\x0644 13-236-136-123           KU8L            K8UL
always \x06A9\x064F\x06BE\x0679 13-236-136-246           KU8[            K8U[
always \x06A9\x064F\x06BE\x062F 13-236-136-145           KU8D            K8UD


# -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Shadda (\x0651) goes after consonant in text file but must go before it in Braille
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

# ------------------------------------
# Dealing with Shadda Grade 2
# ------------------------------------

always \x0646\x0651\x0627 6-26                   N,A          ,5
always \x06CC\x0651\x0627 6-13456                I,A          ,Y
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x0627 6-13-236-1           K8,A         ,K8A
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x0650 6-13-236-15          K8,E         ,K8E
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x06CC 6-13-236-24          K8,I         ,K8I
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x0648 6-13-236-2456        K8,W         ,K8W
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x06D2 6-13-236-34          K8,/         ,K8/
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x064F 6-13-236-136         K8,U         ,K8U
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651\x0646 6-13-236-1345        K8,N         ,K8N
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0650\x0651 6-13-236-15          K8E,         ,K8E
# always \x06A9\x0651\x06BE\x0646 6-13-236-1345        K,8N         ,K8N     not usual order in text but not necessary as G1 table will reposition shadda
always \x0686\x06BE\x0651\x0627 6-16-1           C8,A         ,*A
always \x0686\x0651\x06BE\x0627 6-16-1           C,8A         ,*A
always \x0686\x06BE\x0651\x06CC 6-16-24          C8,I         ,*I
always \x0686\x0651\x06BE\x06CC 6-16-24          C,8I         ,*I
always \x0686\x06BE\x0651\x06D2 6-16-34          C8,/         ,*/
always \x0686\x0651\x06BE\x06D2 6-16-34          C,8/         ,*/
always \x0686\x0651\x06BE\x064F 6-16-136         C,8U         ,*U
always \x0686\x0651\x06BE\x0645 6-16-134         C,8M         ,*M
always \x0686\x06BE\x0651\x0648 6-16-2456        C8,W         ,*W
always \x062A\x0651\x06BE 6-1256                 T,8          ,[backslash]
always \x062A\x06BE\x0651 6-1256                 T8,          ,[backslash]
begmidword \x062A\x0651\x0627 6-256              T,A          ,4
begmidword \x0628\x0651\x0627 6-25               B,A          ,3
always \x0628\x0651\x0627\x0646 6-12-35          B,AN         ,B9
always \x0644\x0627\x0651 6-1236                 LA,          ,V
always \x0644\x0651\x0627 6-1236                 L,A          ,V
always \x0679\x0651\x06BE 6-135                  [,8          ,O
always \x0679\x06BE\x0651\x06D2 6-135-34         [8,/         ,O/
always \x0679\x06BE\x0651\x0627 6-135-1          [8,A         ,OA


# -----------------------------------------------------
# Grade 2 Contractions
# -----------------------------------------------------
